Illinois, session 104th, HB4939.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Works Jobs Program Act is amended 5by changing Sections 20-5, 20-10, 20-20, and 20-25 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 559/20-5)7    Sec. 20-5. Findings. It is in the public policy interest 8of the State to ensure that all Illinois residents have access 9to State capital projects and careers in the construction 10industry and building trades, including those who have been 11historically underrepresented in those trades. It is also in 12the public policy interest of the State to ensure that 13projects funded by the State can provide training and job 14opportunities as a means to increase skills and develop the 15workforce in the construction industry. To ensure that those 16interests are met, the General Assembly hereby creates the 17Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program and the Illinois 18Works Apprenticeship Initiative. 19(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 20    (30 ILCS 559/20-10)21    Sec. 20-10. Definitions. 22    "Apprentice" means a participant in an apprenticeship   HB4939- 2 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1program approved by and registered with the United States 2Department of Labor's Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training. 3    "Apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship and 4training program approved by and registered with the United 5States Department of Labor's Bureau of Apprenticeship and 6Training. 7    "Bid credit" means a virtual dollar for a recipient, 8contractor, or subcontractor to use toward future bids on 9contracts with the State for public works or State-assisted 10projects. 11    "Community-based organization" means a nonprofit 12organization, including an accredited public college or 13university, selected by the Department to participate in the 14Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program. To qualify as a 15"community-based organization", the organization must 16demonstrate the following: 17        (1) the ability to effectively serve diverse and 18    underrepresented populations, including by providing 19    employment services to such populations;20        (2) knowledge of the construction and building trades;21        (3) the ability to recruit, prescreen, and provide 22    preapprenticeship training to prepare workers for 23    employment in the construction and building trades; and24        (4) a plan to provide the following:25            (A) preparatory classes;26            (B) workplace readiness skills, such as resume   HB4939- 3 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1        preparation and interviewing techniques; 2            (C) strategies for overcoming barriers to entry 3        and completion of an apprenticeship program; and4            (D) any prerequisites for acceptance into an 5        apprenticeship program. 6    "Contractor" means a person, corporation, partnership, 7limited liability company, or joint venture entering into a 8contract to construct a public work or State-assisted project.9    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity.11    "Labor hours" means the total hours for workers who are 12receiving an hourly wage and who are directly employed for the 13public works project or who are employed on a State-assisted 14project and are subject to prevailing wage requirements. 15"Labor hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by 16the contractor and subcontractors on the public works project 17and hours performed by workers employed by the recipient, 18contractor, or subcontractors on a State-assisted project. 19"Labor hours" does not include hours worked by the 20forepersons, superintendents, owners, and workers who are not 21subject to prevailing wage requirements. 22    "Minorities" means minority persons as defined in the 23Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 24Disabilities Act.25    "Public works" means all projects, contracted or funded by 26the State or any agency of the State, in whole or in part, from   HB4939- 4 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1appropriated capital funds, that constitute public works under 2the Prevailing Wage Act.3    "Recipient" means a person or entity, other than a public 4body, that has received a grant, loan, incentive, or tax 5subsidy, credit, or rebate through a program established by 6State law and administered by a State agency, that requires 7the payment of prevailing wages to employees engaged in 8construction activities associated with the program.9    "State-assisted project" means a project financed or 10funded, in whole or in part, by a grant, loan, incentive, or 11tax subsidy, credit, or rebate provided through a program 12established by State law and administered by a State agency 13and that requires the payment of prevailing wages to employees 14engaged in construction activities associated with the 15program, or any successor program, including, but not limited 16to, programs established under the Illinois Power Agency Act, 17the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, the Climate and Equitable 18Jobs Act, the Energy Transition Act, and the Broadband 19Expansion Act.20    "Subcontractor" means a person, corporation, partnership, 21limited liability company, or joint venture that has 22contracted with the contractor to perform all or part of the 23work to construct a public work or State-assisted project by a 24contractor. 25    "Underrepresented populations" means populations 26identified by the Department that historically have had   HB4939- 5 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1barriers to entry or advancement in the workforce. 2"Underrepresented populations" includes, but is not limited 3to, minorities, women, and veterans.4(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-601, eff. 12-10-19.) 5    (30 ILCS 559/20-20)6    Sec. 20-20. Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative. 7    (a) The Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative is 8established and shall be administered by the Department and 9the Department of Labor. 10        (1) Subject to the exceptions set forth in subsection 11    (b) of this Section, apprentices shall be utilized on all 12    public works projects estimated to cost $500,000 or more 13    and on all State-assisted projects of any amount in 14    accordance with this subsection (a). 15        (2) For public works projects estimated to cost 16    $500,000 or more, and for State-assisted projects of any 17    amount:18            (A) Not less than 10% of the total labor hours in 19        each prevailing wage classification shall be worked by 20        apprentices, subject to the apprentice-to-journeyman 21        ratio of the applicable apprenticeship program. Total 22        labor hours shall be the goal of the Illinois Works 23        Apprenticeship Initiative is that apprentices will 24        perform either 10% of the total labor hours actually 25        worked in each prevailing wage classification or 10%   HB4939- 6 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1        of the estimated labor hours in each prevailing wage 2        classification, whichever is less. The apprenticeship 3        requirement set forth in this subparagraph shall apply 4        to each recipient, contractor, and subcontractor 5        performing work on the project, with respect to the 6        labor hours performed by its employees in each 7        prevailing wage classification. For the purposes of 8        this subsection, a worker may be considered an 9        apprentice in only one trade for the duration of a 10        project and the labor hours of that worker as an 11        apprentice in another prevailing wage classification 12        shall not count as hours worked by an apprentice. 13            (B) For contracts and grant agreements executed 14        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 15        103rd General Assembly and before January 1, 2024, of 16        this goal, at least 25% of the labor hours of each 17        prevailing wage classification performed by 18        apprentices shall be performed by graduates of the 19        Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, the Illinois 20        Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program, or the 21        Highway Construction Careers Training Program. For 22        contracts and grant agreements executed on or after 23        June January 1, 2026 2024, of the requirement set 24        forth in subparagraph (A), the goal of the Illinois 25        Works Apprenticeship Initiative is that this goal, at 26        least 50% of the labor hours of each prevailing wage   HB4939- 7 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1        classification performed by apprentices of each 2        recipient, contractor, and subcontractor shall be 3        performed by graduates of the Illinois Works 4        Preapprenticeship Program, the Illinois Climate Works 5        Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway Construction 6        Careers Training Program.7        (3) For public works projects estimated to cost 8    $500,000 or more and for State-assisted projects of any 9    amount, recipients, contractors, and subcontractors 10    subject to this Act shall:11            (A) file a certified payroll with the Department 12        and the Department of Labor as required under the 13        Prevailing Wage Act;14            (B) record the number of labor hours of journeymen 15        and apprentices that are used on the project, 16        including an estimate of the number of such labor 17        hours that are expected to be used on the project;18            (C) record the registration, placement, 19        advancement, and graduation of any apprentice that 20        works on the project for a period of 5 years; and21            (D) indicate in a certified payroll the 22        classification of any employee who is an apprentice.23    The Department and the Department of Labor may require the 24production of records consistent with the Prevailing Wage Act 25relative to a matter under investigation. The Department and 26Department of Labor shall make accessible to the public the   HB4939- 8 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1following information from a certified payroll: (i) names; 2(ii) classifications; (iii) skill level; (iv) gross wages paid 3in the pay period; (v) number of hours worked each day; (vi) 4starting and ending times of work each day; (vii) hourly wage 5rates, hourly overtime rates; and (viii) hourly fringe benefit 6rates of employees. The Department and Department of Labor 7shall redact any social security numbers, addresses, and 8telephone numbers from all records made accessible to the 9public under this Section.10    If there is a conflict between an apprentice requirement 11or goal set forth in this Section and an apprenticeship 12requirement or goal for a public works or State-assisted 13project set forth in another law of this State, the more 14stringent requirement shall apply.15    (a-5) The Department of Labor may reduce or waive the 16apprenticeship requirements set forth in subparagraph (A) of 17paragraph (2) of subsection (a) upon a written request by a 18recipient, contractor, or subcontractor to the Department of 19Labor made no later than 45 days before the start of work on a 20project covered by this Act. The Department of Labor may grant 21a reduction or waiver only upon a determination that the 22recipient, contractor, or subcontractor has demonstrated that 23insufficient apprentices to meet requirements set forth in 24subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) are 25available. In order to make the demonstration, the recipient, 26contractor, or subcontractor shall submit with its request to   HB4939- 9 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1the Department of Labor documentation showing: 2        (1) the recipient, contractor, or subcontractor made a 3    written request, including the proposed dates of 4    employment, occupation of qualified apprentices needed, 5    location of work to be performed, the number of qualified 6    apprentices needed, the number of labor hours expected to 7    be performed by the qualified apprentices, and the name 8    and contact information of the recipient, contractor, or 9    subcontractor requesting employment of qualified 10    apprentices, to at least one apprenticeship program that 11    has a geographic area of operation that includes the 12    location of the work, that trains apprentices in the 13    occupations needed to perform the work, and that has a 14    usual and customary business practice of agreements with 15    employers, including through a sponsoring labor 16    organization, for the placement of apprentices in the 17    occupation for which they are training, consistent with 18    the standards and requirements set forth in 29 CFR 29 and 19    29 CFR 30 and any subsequent guidance issued by the United 20    States Department of Labor; and 21        (2) the written request was denied or the 22    apprenticeship program failed to respond within 7 business 23    days after the written request.24    A waiver shall not be granted under this subsection 25because the recipient, contractor, or subcontractor has not or 26will not execute an agreement with a labor organization   HB4939- 10 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1necessary for an apprenticeship program to place an 2apprentice. The Department of Labor may, in its determination, 3require a recipient, contractor, or subcontractor to make 4written requests to more than one apprenticeship program if 5the Department of Labor has information that other 6apprenticeship programs within the applicable geographic area 7are generally able to provide apprentices consistent with this 8Section.9    The Department of Labor shall maintain a list of 10apprenticeship programs, accessible to the public, that have 11indicated to the Department of Labor that they are generally 12able to provide apprentices. Any apprenticeship program may 13request to be added to this list, with information on the 14classifications of employees it trains, its geographic area, 15and a contact person, including address, telephone number, and 16e-mail. 17    (b) Before or during the term of a contract subject to this 18Section, the Department of Labor may reduce or waive the goals 19set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a). Prior to the 20Department of Labor granting a request for a reduction or 21waiver, the Department of Labor shall determine, in its 22discretion, whether to hold a public hearing on the request. 23In determining whether to hold a public hearing, the 24Department of Labor may consider factors, including the scale 25of the project and whether the recipient, contractor, or 26subcontractor seeking the reduction or waiver has previously   HB4939- 11 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1requested reductions or waivers on other projects. The 2Department of Labor may also consult with the Business 3Enterprise Council under the Business Enterprise for 4Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act and the 5Chief Procurement Officer or person of similar responsibility 6of the agency administering the public works or State-assisted 7project contract. The Department of Labor may grant a 8reduction or waiver of the goals set forth in subparagraph (B) 9of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) upon a determination that:10        (1) the recipient, contractor, or subcontractor has 11    demonstrated that insufficient apprentices are available 12    in accordance with paragraph (1) of subsection (b);13        (2) the reasonable and necessary requirements of the 14    contract do not allow the goal to be met;15        (3) there is a disproportionately high ratio of 16    material costs to labor hours that makes meeting the goal 17    infeasible;18        (4) apprentice labor hour goals conflict with existing 19    requirements, including federal requirements, in 20    connection with the public work; or 21        (5) the recipient, contractor, or subcontractor has 22    demonstrated that insufficient graduates of the Illinois 23    Works Preapprenticeship Program are available to meet the 24    goals requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of 25    subsection (a).26    A reduction or waiver of an apprenticeship goal does not   HB4939- 12 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1act as a reduction or waiver of an apprenticeship requirement 2set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subsection 3(a).4    (c) Recipients, contractors, Contractors and 5subcontractors must submit a certification to the Department 6and the agency that is administering the contract, or the 7grant, loan, incentive, or tax credit, rebate, or subsidy 8agreement funding the contract, demonstrating that the 9recipient, contractor, or subcontractor has:10        (1) met the apprentice labor hour requirements and 11    goals set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a); 12        (2) received a reduction or waiver pursuant to 13    subsection (b); or 14        (3) not complied with the labor hour requirements and 15    goals set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and did 16    not receive a reduction or waiver pursuant to subsection 17    (b). 18    It shall be deemed to be a material breach of the contract, 19or the grant agreement funding the contract, and entitle the 20State to declare a default, terminate the contract or grant 21agreement funding it, and exercise those remedies provided for 22in the contract, at law, or in equity if the recipient, 23contractor, or subcontractor fails to submit the certification 24required in this subsection or submits false or misleading 25information. 26    Intentional failure to comply with the Illinois Works   HB4939- 13 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1Apprenticeship Initiative, including, but not limited to, the 2apprenticeship requirements and goals set forth in paragraph 3(2) of subsection (a), may result in the State agency that 4contracted or funded the public works or State-assisted 5project: (i) terminating the contract or agreement involved, 6(ii) prohibiting the party that contracted with the State from 7participating in public contracts or agreements for a period 8not to exceed 5 3 years, (iii) seeking a penalty of up to 25% 9of the contract or agreement as a result of the violation, or 10(iv) any combination of items (i) through (iii). State 11agencies shall report to the Department all projects that did 12not comply with the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative 13and any action taken against the noncompliant party and shall 14provide an action plan to address the reported instance of 15noncompliance with the Illinois Works Apprenticeship 16Initiative.17    (c-5) The Department of Labor may accept complaints and 18investigate any claim of a violation of the apprenticeship 19requirements and goals set forth in paragraph (2) of 20subsection (a), consistent with the power and procedures set 21forth in the Prevailing Wage Act. If the Department of Labor 22determines that a violation has occurred, in addition to any 23other action or remedies available under this Act, the 24Prevailing Wage Act, and any other law, the Department of 25Labor shall notify the Department and the Comptroller of the 26violation and, until the matter is resolved to the   HB4939- 14 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1satisfaction of the Department of Labor, the Comptroller shall 2withhold any and all payments associated with the public works 3or State-assisted project. Any withholding made in accordance 4with this Section is not subject to any penalty for late 5payment under the State Prompt Payment Act.6    (d) No later than one year after the effective date of this 7Act, and by April 1 of every calendar year thereafter, the 8Department of Labor shall submit a report to the Illinois 9Works Review Panel regarding the use of apprentices under the 10Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative for public works and 11State-assisted projects. To the extent it is available, the 12report shall include the following information: 13        (1) the total number of labor hours on each project 14    and the percentage of labor hours actually worked by 15    apprentices on each public works and State-assisted 16    project; 17        (2) the number of apprentices used in each public 18    works and State-assisted project, broken down by trade; 19    and 20        (3) the number and percentage of minorities, women, 21    and veterans utilized as apprentices on each public works 22    and State-assisted project. 23    (e) The Department and the Department of Labor shall adopt 24any rules deemed necessary to implement the Illinois Works 25Apprenticeship Initiative. In order to provide for the 26expeditious and timely implementation of this Act, the   HB4939- 15 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1Department and the Department of Labor may adopt emergency 2rules. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by this 3subsection is deemed to be necessary for the public interest, 4safety, and welfare. 5    (f) The Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative shall not 6interfere with any contracts or grants in existence on the 7effective date of this Act. 8    (g) Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in this 9Act, any State agency that administers a construction program 10for which federal law or regulations establish standards and 11procedures for the utilization of apprentices may implement 12the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative using the federal 13standards and procedures for the establishment of requirements 14and goals and utilization procedures for the State-funded, as 15well as the federally assisted, portions of the program. In 16such cases, these requirements and goals shall not exceed 17those established pursuant to the relevant federal statutes or 18regulations.19    (h) The Department shall maintain a list of graduates of 20the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program for a period of 21not less than one year after the participant graduates from 22the Program. The list shall include the name, address, county 23of residence, phone number, email address, and the 24self-attested construction and building trade career path 25preferences of each graduate. This list shall be made 26available to any recipient, contractor, or subcontractor, as   HB4939- 16 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1well as any apprenticeship program approved by and registered 2with the United States Department of Labor's Bureau of 3Apprenticeship and Training in alignment with the graduate's 4self-attested construction and building trade career path 5preferences. 6(Source: P.A. 103-305, eff. 7-28-23.) 7    (30 ILCS 559/20-25)8    Sec. 20-25. The Illinois Works Review Panel. 9    (a) The Illinois Works Review Panel is created and shall 10be comprised of 25 members, each serving 3-year terms. The 11Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of 12the Senate shall each appoint 5 members within 30 days after 13the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 14Assembly. The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives 15and the Minority Leader of the Senate shall each appoint 5 16members within 30 days after the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. The Director of 18Commerce and Economic Opportunity, or his or her designee, 19shall serve as a member. The Governor shall appoint the 20following individuals to serve as members within 30 days after 21the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 22Assembly: a representative from a contractor organization; a 23representative from a labor organization; and 2 members of the 24public with workforce development expertise, one of whom shall 25be a representative of a nonprofit organization that addresses   HB4939- 17 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1workforce development. 2    (b) The members of the Illinois Works Review Panel shall 3make recommendations to the Department regarding 4identification and evaluation of community-based 5organizations. 6    (c) The Illinois Works Review Panel shall meet, at least 7quarterly, to review and evaluate (i) the Illinois Works 8Preapprenticeship Program and the Illinois Works 9Apprenticeship Initiative, (ii) ideas to diversify the trainee 10corps in the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program and the 11workforce in the construction industry in Illinois, (iii) 12ideas to increase diversity in active apprenticeship programs 13in Illinois, and (iv) workforce demographic data collected by 14the Illinois Department of Labor. The Illinois Works Review 15Panel shall hold its initial meeting no later than 45 days 16after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 17General Assembly. 18    (d) All State contracts and grant agreements funding State 19contracts shall include a requirement that the recipient, 20contractor, and subcontractor shall, upon reasonable notice, 21appear before and respond to requests for information from the 22Illinois Works Review Panel. 23    (e) By August 1, 2020, and every August 1 thereafter, the 24Illinois Works Review Panel shall report to the General 25Assembly on its evaluation of the Illinois Works 26Preapprenticeship Program and the Illinois Works   HB4939- 18 -LRB104 19473 SPS 32921 b1Apprenticeship Initiative, including any recommended 2modifications.3(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-601, eff. 12-10-19; 4101-633, eff. 6-5-20.) 5    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 6severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.